Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1385
Historically significant real property; qualification.

The following real property shall qualify as historically significant real property for purposes of the historic rehabilitation valuation authorized by section 77-1391 pursuant to the authority granted to the Legislature under subdivision (12) of Article VIII, section 2, of the Constitution of Nebraska:

(1) Real property individually listed in the National Register of Historic Places;

(2) Real property within a district listed in the National Register of Historic Places that is historically significant as determined by the State Historic Preservation Officer and approved under section 77-1387;

(3) Real property individually designated pursuant to a landmark ordinance or resolution that has been approved by the State Historic Preservation Officer pursuant to section 77-1386; and

(4) Real property within a district designated pursuant to a landmark ordinance or resolution that has been approved by the State Historic Preservation Officer pursuant to section 77-1386 that is historically significant as determined by the State Historic Preservation Officer and approved under section 77-1387.

Laws 2005, LB 66, § 1.